Illinois, session 104th, HB1474.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5changing Section 65 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/65)7    Sec. 65. Prohibited areas. 8    (a) A licensee under this Act shall not knowingly carry a 9firearm on or into:10        (1) Any building, real property, and parking area 11    under the control of a public or private elementary or 12    secondary school.13        (2) Any building, real property, and parking area 14    under the control of a pre-school or child care facility, 15    including any room or portion of a building under the 16    control of a pre-school or child care facility. Nothing in 17    this paragraph shall prevent the operator of a child care 18    facility in a family home from owning or possessing a 19    firearm in the home or license under this Act, if no child 20    under child care at the home is present in the home or the 21    firearm in the home is stored in a locked container when a 22    child under child care at the home is present in the home.23        (3) Any building, parking area, or portion of a   HB1474- 2 -LRB104 03485 RLC 13508 b1    building under the control of an officer of the executive 2    or legislative branch of government, provided that nothing 3    in this paragraph shall prohibit a licensee from carrying 4    a concealed firearm onto the real property, bikeway, or 5    trail in a park regulated by the Department of Natural 6    Resources or any other designated public hunting area or 7    building where firearm possession is permitted as 8    established by the Department of Natural Resources under 9    Section 1.8 of the Wildlife Code.10        (4) Any building designated for matters before a 11    circuit court, appellate court, or the Supreme Court, or 12    any building or portion of a building under the control of 13    the Supreme Court.14        (5) Any building or portion of a building under the 15    control of a unit of local government.16        (6) Any building, real property, and parking area 17    under the control of an adult or juvenile detention or 18    correctional institution, prison, or jail.19        (7) Any building, real property, and parking area 20    under the control of a public or private hospital or 21    hospital affiliate, mental health facility, or nursing 22    home.23        (8) (Blank). Any bus, train, or form of transportation 24    paid for in whole or in part with public funds, and any 25    building, real property, and parking area under the 26    control of a public transportation facility paid for in   HB1474- 3 -LRB104 03485 RLC 13508 b1    whole or in part with public funds.2        (9) Any building, real property, and parking area 3    under the control of an establishment that serves alcohol 4    on its premises, if more than 50% of the establishment's 5    gross receipts within the prior 3 months is from the sale 6    of alcohol. The owner of an establishment who knowingly 7    fails to prohibit concealed firearms on its premises as 8    provided in this paragraph or who knowingly makes a false 9    statement or record to avoid the prohibition on concealed 10    firearms under this paragraph is subject to the penalty 11    under subsection (c-5) of Section 10-1 of the Liquor 12    Control Act of 1934.13        (10) Any public gathering or special event conducted 14    on property open to the public that requires the issuance 15    of a permit from the unit of local government, provided 16    this prohibition shall not apply to a licensee who must 17    walk through a public gathering in order to access his or 18    her residence, place of business, or vehicle.19        (11) Any building or real property that has been 20    issued a Special Event Retailer's license as defined in 21    Section 1-3.17.1 of the Liquor Control Act during the time 22    designated for the sale of alcohol by the Special Event 23    Retailer's license, or a Special use permit license as 24    defined in subsection (q) of Section 5-1 of the Liquor 25    Control Act during the time designated for the sale of 26    alcohol by the Special use permit license.  HB1474- 4 -LRB104 03485 RLC 13508 b1        (12) Any public playground.2        (13) Any public park, athletic area, or athletic 3    facility under the control of a municipality or park 4    district, provided nothing in this Section shall prohibit 5    a licensee from carrying a concealed firearm while on a 6    trail or bikeway if only a portion of the trail or bikeway 7    includes a public park.8        (14) Any real property under the control of the Cook 9    County Forest Preserve District.10        (15) Any building, classroom, laboratory, medical 11    clinic, hospital, artistic venue, athletic venue, 12    entertainment venue, officially recognized 13    university-related organization property, whether owned or 14    leased, and any real property, including parking areas, 15    sidewalks, and common areas under the control of a public 16    or private community college, college, or university.17        (16) Any building, real property, or parking area 18    under the control of a gaming facility licensed under the 19    Illinois Gambling Act or the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 20    1975, including an inter-track wagering location licensee.21        (17) Any stadium, arena, or the real property or 22    parking area under the control of a stadium, arena, or any 23    collegiate or professional sporting event.24        (18) Any building, real property, or parking area 25    under the control of a public library.26        (19) Any building, real property, or parking area   HB1474- 5 -LRB104 03485 RLC 13508 b1    under the control of an airport.2        (20) Any building, real property, or parking area 3    under the control of an amusement park.4        (21) Any building, real property, or parking area 5    under the control of a zoo or museum.6        (22) Any street, driveway, parking area, property, 7    building, or facility, owned, leased, controlled, or used 8    by a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site 9    or facility regulated by the federal Nuclear Regulatory 10    Commission. The licensee shall not under any circumstance 11    store a firearm or ammunition in his or her vehicle or in a 12    compartment or container within a vehicle located anywhere 13    in or on the street, driveway, parking area, property, 14    building, or facility described in this paragraph.15        (23) Any area where firearms are prohibited under 16    federal law.17    (a-5) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a public or 18private community college, college, or university from:19        (1) prohibiting persons from carrying a firearm within 20    a vehicle owned, leased, or controlled by the college or 21    university;22        (2) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies 23    regarding student, employee, or visitor misconduct and 24    discipline, including suspension and expulsion;25        (3) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies 26    regarding the storage or maintenance of firearms, which   HB1474- 6 -LRB104 03485 RLC 13508 b1    must include designated areas where persons can park 2    vehicles that carry firearms; and3        (4) permitting the carrying or use of firearms for the 4    purpose of instruction and curriculum of officially 5    recognized programs, including but not limited to military 6    science and law enforcement training programs, or in any 7    designated area used for hunting purposes or target 8    shooting.9    (a-10) The owner of private real property of any type may 10prohibit the carrying of concealed firearms on the property 11under his or her control. The owner must post a sign in 12accordance with subsection (d) of this Section indicating that 13firearms are prohibited on the property, unless the property 14is a private residence.15    (b) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (a-5), and (a-10) of 16this Section except under paragraph (22) or (23) of subsection 17(a), any licensee prohibited from carrying a concealed firearm 18into the parking area of a prohibited location specified in 19subsection (a), (a-5), or (a-10) of this Section shall be 20permitted to carry a concealed firearm on or about his or her 21person within a vehicle into the parking area and may store a 22firearm or ammunition concealed in a case within a locked 23vehicle or locked container out of plain view within the 24vehicle in the parking area. A licensee may carry a concealed 25firearm in the immediate area surrounding his or her vehicle 26within a prohibited parking lot area only for the limited   HB1474- 7 -LRB104 03485 RLC 13508 b1purpose of storing or retrieving a firearm within the 2vehicle's trunk. For purposes of this subsection, "case" 3includes a glove compartment or console that completely 4encloses the concealed firearm or ammunition, the trunk of the 5vehicle, or a firearm carrying box, shipping box, or other 6container.7    (c) A licensee shall not be in violation of this Section 8while he or she is traveling along a public right of way that 9touches or crosses any of the premises under subsection (a), 10(a-5), or (a-10) of this Section if the concealed firearm is 11carried on his or her person in accordance with the provisions 12of this Act or is being transported in a vehicle by the 13licensee in accordance with all other applicable provisions of 14law.15    (d) Signs stating that the carrying of firearms is 16prohibited shall be clearly and conspicuously posted at the 17entrance of a building, premises, or real property specified 18in this Section as a prohibited area, unless the building or 19premises is a private residence. Signs shall be of a uniform 20design as established by the Illinois State Police and shall 21be 4 inches by 6 inches in size. The Illinois State Police 22shall adopt rules for standardized signs to be used under this 23subsection.24(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)